Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-902
Lien; perfection; financing statement; filing; fee.

A lien created under section 52-901 shall be perfected as provided in article 9, Uniform Commercial Code. Any financing statement filed to perfect such lien shall be filed within six months after the fuel or lubricant was furnished and shall contain or have attached thereto (1) the name and address and the social security number or federal tax identification number of the person claiming the lien, (2) the name and address and the social security number or federal tax identification number, if known, of the person to whom such fuel or lubricant was furnished for use in farm machinery in the production of crops, (3) the amount of fuel or lubricant furnished, and (4) the amount due for furnishing such fuel or lubricant. The failure to include the social security number or federal tax identification number shall not render any filing unperfected. At the time the lien is filed, the lienholder shall send a copy to the person to whom the fuel or lubricant was furnished. The fee for filing, amending, or releasing such lien shall be the same as set forth in section 9-525, Uniform Commercial Code.

Laws 1957, c. 226, § 2, p. 775;

Laws 1984, LB 808, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 943, § 7;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 83;

Laws 1999, LB 550, § 18;

Laws 2001, LB 54, § 10.

This section requires a provider of petroleum products to file his lien within six months after the fuel or lubricants are provided. Circle 76 Fertilizer v. Nelsen, 219 Neb. 661, 365 N.W.2d 460 (1985).